Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2425.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Auditor general; special audit; state land department A. The auditor general shall conduct a special audit pursuant to section 41-1279.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, of the state land department. B. The special audit must examine all of the following: 1. Vacancy on state trust lands with a slope of less than fifteen percent.  The audit must include an analysis of whether any parties have submitted applications or letters of interest for the state trust land parcels and reasons provided by the state land department for denial of any application or letter of interest. 2. Any commissioner-initiated land sales in counties with a population of more than four hundred thousand persons that received only one bid.  The audit must include reasons why one bid was received on the land sale, including an evaluation of the appraised value of the land that was sold. 3. Any solar leases and sales on state trust lands that went to public auction and received only one bid.  The audit must include reasons why one bid was received on the land lease or sale, including an evaluation of the appraised value of the land that was leased or sold. 4. An evaluation of the reclamation requirements the state land department requires of any solar lease or sale to restore the lands to previous conditions at the end of the solar projects useful life.